Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.210

Child support data report.

In order to perform the required quadrennial review of the Washington state child support guidelines under RCW 26.19.025, the division of child support must prepare a report at least every four years using data compiled from child support court and administrative orders. The report must include all information the division of child support determines is necessary to perform the quadrennial review. On a monthly basis, the clerk of the court must forward all child support worksheets that have been filed with the court to the division of child support.

[ 2011 c 21 s 1; 2007 c 313 s 4; 2005 c 282 s 33; 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 22.]

NOTES:

Findings—2007 c 313: See note following RCW 26.19.025.

Effective dates—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 26.09.100.